apertium-uzb.uzb.lexc
              !# "Мен айтарымды айттым";
%<ger_impf%>  ! -adigan
              !# "Ол бүгін кешкілік болатынын айтты";
%<ger_pres%>  ! -ayotgan
%<ger_abst%>                         !
! TODO cover -{E}{T}{I}нд{I}{K} form


!!! Verbal adjectives (gpr)

%<gpr_impf%>  ! -adigan
%<gpr_pres%>
%<gpr_fut%>                         !
%<gpr_fut_plan%>                   !
%<gpr_rsub%>


!! Transitivity
%<tv%>
%<iv%>

!!!! PUNCTUATION !!!

%<percent%>   ! Percent
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

!!!! JAWOHL TWOL!!!!

%{s%}            ! Becomes "s" after a vowel, otherwise null
%{i%}            ! Becomes as "i" after a consonant, otherwise null
%{E%}            ! Becomes as "a" after a consonant, otherwise "y"    
%{K%}                !k-g
%{Q%}                !q-gʻ

! Archiphonemes and escaped symbols (from apertium-kaz) ! "FIXME"

%{L%}         ! Archiphoneme ‘l‘: realised as л, д, т
%{N%}         ! Archiphoneme ‘n‘: realised as н, д, т
%{M%}         ! Archiphoneme ‘m‘: realised as м, б, п
%{G%}         ! Archiphoneme ‘gʻ: realised as к, қ, г, ғ
!%{G%}         ! Archiphoneme ‘k‘: realised as к, қ  >>>FIXME ???<<<
%{ʻ%}         ! for q→gʻ changes
%{D%}         ! Archiphoneme ‘d‘: realised as д, т
%{A%}         ! Archiphoneme ‘aʼ: realsied as е, а
%{I%}         ! Archiphoneme ‘iʼ: realised as і, ы
%{S%}         ! Realised as ‘с‘ or ‘‘; only used in 3rd person morphology
%{K%}         ! Realised as ‘к‘ or ‘қ‘
%{n%}         ! Realised as ‘н‘ or ‘‘;
              ! only used in 3rd person morphology and -NIKI
%{l%}         ! Realised as ‘л‘ or ‘н‘; only used in passive -{I}{l}
%{y%}         ! Realised as ‘‘ or ‘{I}‘; only used in epenthesis for nouns
%{o%}         ! Realised as ‘‘; triggers dialectal interpretation of Iп
%{E%}         ! Realised as ‘а‘, ‘е‘, ‘й‘ (={A}/й)
%{д%}         ! Realised as д before vowels, 0 otherwise
%{т%}         ! Realised as т before vowels, 0 otherwise


%{а%}         ! Archiphoneme for back vowel numerals/abbreviation
%{э%}         ! Archiphoneme for front vowel numerals/abbreviation
%{ә%}         ! Surfaces as ә, but:
              ! triggers front harmony for {I} and back harmony for {A}

%{u%}              ! Harmonising "deletion/insertion vowel"

%{й%}         !
%{л%}         !
%{н%}         !
%{з%}         !
%{т%}         !
%{с%}         !

%{☭%}         ! Used to tell the phonology about a Russian word
%{і%}         !

%{❗%}         ! Obstacles on the road!!!
%{ъ%}         ! Force back harmony

%{a%}                         !
%{u%}                         !
%{b%}                         !
%{p%}                         !
%{z%}                         !


%{🂡%}         !


%>            ! Morpheme boundary
%,            !
%.            !
%             ! Space
%-            !
%%            !

%>

ʻ
%`
%ʻ
%  

%[%-coop%]

%[%+p3pl%]


LEXICON Root

Digits ;
Punctuation ;
Hardcoded ;
Common ;
Proper ;
Copula ;

!! INTERFACE
!! =========

!! Proper nouns
!! ------------

LEXICON NP-TOP
%<np%>%<top%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: SUBST ; 

!! Verbs
!! -----

LEXICON V
VERB-TD ;

LEXICON V-IV
VERB-IV ;

LEXICON V-IV-COOP
V-IV ;

LEXICON V-IV-REFL
V-IV ;

LEXICON V-IV-LESS
V-IV ;

LEXICON V-IV-REFL-LESS
V-IV-REFL ;

LEXICON V-TV
VERB-TV ;

LEXICON V-TV-CAUS
V-TV ;

LEXICON V-TV-COOP
V-TV ;

!! Nouns
!! -----

LEXICON N1 ! Lexicon used for general nouns with no particularities. It takes PLURAL*-POSSESSIVE*-CASE in this order
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ; 

LEXICON N1-NAT ! Nationalities which can form language, etc.
               ! e.g. turk, turkçe
N1 ;

LEXICON N1→V ! A noun which is usually is not used on its own
N1 ;

LEXICON N1--V ! A noun which is usually is not used on its own
N1 ;

LEXICON N1-PL
N1 ;

LEXICON N1-VN
N1 ;

LEXICON N1--N1
N1 ;

LEXICON N1-REMOVE
N1 ;

LEXICON N1-ADR
N1 ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX

%<n%>:%>%{ʻ%}%{s%}i CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>:%>%{ʻ%}lar%>%{s%}i CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>: POSSESSIVES ;

!! Adjectives
!! ----------

! FIXME: bring in line with kaz.lexc
! FIXME: add comparative

LEXICON A1
%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON A1-SUP
A1 ;

LEXICON A1-NAT
A1 ;

LEXICON A1→V
A1 ;

LEXICON A2 
%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON A2-SUP
A2 ;

LEXICON A2--V
A2 ;


LEXICON A5

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

!! Adverbs
!! -------

LEXICON ADV
ADV3 ;

LEXICON ADV-ATTR
%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>:%{G%}i # ;

!! Rest
!! ----

LEXICON POST
%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON POST-NOM
POST ;

LEXICON POST-NOM-GEN
POST ;

LEXICON POST-GEN
POST ;

LEXICON POST-DAT
POST ;

LEXICON POST-ABL
POST ;

LEXICON POST-INS
POST ;

LEXICON PREP
%<prep%>: # ;

LEXICON IJ
%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON IJ→IJ
IJ ;

LEXICON IJ←IJ
IJ ;

LEXICON IDEO
%<ideo%>: # ; 

LEXICON TIT 
%<title%>: # ; 

LEXICON ABBR
%<abbr%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON CA
%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS 
%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC 
%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CC-SOYED
CC ;

LEXICON CC-RAZDEL
CC ;

LEXICON CC-PROTIV
CC ;

LEXICON QST
!%+mi%<qst%>:%>mi # ;
%<qst%>: # ;

LEXICON POSTADV
%<postadv%>: # ;

LEXICON PAREN
%<paren%>: # ;

LEXICON PHRASE
%<phrase%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BU

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:ning # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:nga # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ni # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ndan # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:nda # ;
! %<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:nuki%{n%} CASE ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<attr%>:ndagi CASE ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<com%>:nunla # ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:nu%{n%} CASE ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:nlar CASE-ETC ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:lar CASE-ETC ;
! %<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:nları%{n%} CASE ;

LEXICON VERB-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: VERB-IV-FULL ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>%<coop%>:%>%{i%}sh VERB-IV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>:%[%-coop%]%>%{i%}sh VERB-IV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pass%>%<coop%>:%>%{i%}%{L%}%>%{i%}sh VERB-IV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<coop%>:%>%{D%}ir%>%{i%}sh VERB-IV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} VERB-IV-FULL ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<ref%>:%>in VERB-IV-FULL ;   ! These should just be lexicalised
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>ma VERB-IV-FULL ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<pass%>%<neg%>:%>il%>ma VERB-IV-FULL ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<ref%>%<neg%>:%>in%>ma VERB-IV-FULL ;

LEXICON VERB-IV-FULL

VERB-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON VERB-TD

%<v%>%<TD%>: VERB-TV-FULL ;
!%<v%>%<TD%>%<neg%>:ma VERB-TV-FULL ; 

LEXICON VERB-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>i%{L%} VERB-TV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<coop%>:%>%{i%}sh VERB-TV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>:%[%-coop%]%>%{i%}sh VERB-TV-FULL ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>%<neg%>:%>ilma VERB-TV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>%<coop%>:%>%{i%}%{L%}%>%{i%}sh VERB-TV-FULL ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<coop%>:%>%{D%}ir%>%{i%}sh VERB-TV-FULL ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<ref%>:%>in VERB-TV-FULL ;     ! These should just be lexicalised
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<ref%>%<neg%>:%>inma VERB-TV-FULL ;
!%<v%>%<tv%>%<neg%>:ma VERB-TV-FULL ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: VERB-TV-FULL ;

LEXICON VERB-TV-FULL

VERB-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-AUX

%<vaux%>: VERB-INFL-COMMON ;
%<vaux%>:%[%-coop%]%>%{i%}sh VERB-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON VERB-INFL-COMMON

PRES-CONT ;
%<neg%>:%>ma PRES-CONT ;

PRES-COND ;
%<neg%>:%>ma PRES-COND ;

AORIST ;
%<neg%>:%>ma AORIST ;

INDEF-PAST ;

PAST ;
%<neg%>:%>ma PAST ;

EVIDENTIAL-PAST ;

NON-FINITE ;
GERUND ;
! PERMISSIVE ;

IMPERATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>ma IMPERATIVE ;

FUT ;

V-INFL-ABIL ;

!!!!!!!COPULA SUFFIXES!!!!!!

LEXICON Common
a:a CC-PROTIV ; ! 
azl:azl A1→V ; ! 
azot:azot N1→V ; ! 
aylanay:aylanay N1-ADR ; ! 
ayra:ayra N1→V ; ! 
akasi:akasi N1-ADR ; ! 
aksa:aksa N1→V ; ! 
aksincha:aksincha PAREN ; ! 
alaykum:alaykum IJ←IJ ; !
alkissa:alkissa PAREN ; ! 
aloqali:aloqali POST-INS ; ! "concerning"
ana%-mana:ana%-mana PHRASE ; ! 
anov%-manov:anov%-manov PHRASE ; ! 
arabcha:arabcha A1-NAT ; ! 
assalomu:assalomu IJ→IJ ; ! 
afgʻon:afgʻon N1-PL ; ! 
afgʻoncha:afgʻoncha A1-NAT ; ! 
baqavli:baqavli PREP ; ! 
bamisoli:bamisoli PREP ; ! 
battarin:battarin A1-SUP ; ! 
berli:berli ADV-ATTR ; ! 
bikri:bikri N1--N1 ; ! 
bilanok:bilanok POST-NOM-GEN ; ! 
birlan:birlan POST-NOM-GEN ; ! 
biroq:biroq CC-PROTIV ; ! 
boʻb%-boʻsh:boʻb%-boʻsh A1-SUP ; ! 
boʻm%-boʻsh:boʻm%-boʻsh A2-SUP ; ! 
boʻshanqira:boʻshanqira V-IV-REFL-LESS ; ! 
bogʻot:bogʻot N1-PL ; ! 
botinqira:botinqira V-IV-LESS ; ! 
boshlab:boshlab POST-ABL ; ! 
bugun:bugun ADV-ATTR ; ! 
va:va CC-SOYED ; ! 
vaholanki:vaholanki CC-SOYED ; ! 
gacha:gacha POST ; ! ""
Golland:Golland N1-NAT ; ! ""
goh:goh CC-RAZDEL ; ! 
goho:goho CC-RAZDEL ; ! 
devonbegi:devonbek N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! 
dimogʻ%-fyroq:dimogʻ%-fyroq N1--V ; ! 
ding:ding A2--V ; ! 
duqur:duqur IDEO ; ! 0.9997808765337424
yelpi:yelpi V-TV ; ! 0.998830132786982
zabardast:zabardast A2 ; ! 0.7046338476034221
zg:zg N1-REMOVE ; ! ""
zich:zich A1 ; ! 0.9114775303169502
Q%.:Q%.  ABBR ; ! "" ! El++
ilash:ilash V-IV ; ! 0.9999346652287782
ilgarigicha:ilgarigicha ADV ; ! 0.995298804069214
ilii:ilii V-IV-REFL ; ! 0.9985281091930504
indash:indash V-TV-COOP ; ! 0.9873796682525796
kabi:kabi CS ; ! "such as/like"
koʻz% yoshi:koʻz% yosh N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "tear"
koʻndir:koʻndir V-TV-CAUS ; ! 0.9999989631213738
kor:kor VERB-TV ; ! "to see"
qarab:qarab POST-DAT ; ! "according to"
qaraganda:qaraganda POST-NOM ; ! ""
qatna:qatna VERB-IV ; ! "to attend"
qoʻllash:qoʻllash V-IV-COOP ; ! 0.9613387736262711
qoplan:qoplan V-TV ; ! 0.9996503865061597
qudagʻay:qudagʻay N1 ; ! 0.9999581399401944
qup%-quruq:qup%-quruq A2-SUP ; ! 0.9884272958789241
lik%-lik:lik%-lik N1--V ; ! 0.6503925677147291
misol% uchun:misol% uchun CA ; ! "for example"
mi:mi QST ; ! ""
Mojar:Mojar N1-NAT ; ! "Hungarian"
na% na:na% na CC ; ! "neither/nor" ! how could we effectively use this in this form?
nashʼa:nashʼa IDEO ; ! 0.5406787751250342
nisbatan:nisbatan POST ; ! "compared to"
nozik:nozik A2 ; ! 0.9999999999988278
oʻzish:oʻzish N1-VN ; ! 0.7566544429514427
oʻylan:oʻylan V-IV-REFL ; ! 0.999350828209418
oʻrmala:oʻrmala V-IV ; ! 0.9999987899325223
oʻsha:oʻsha PRON-DEM-BU ; ! ""
oldin:oldin POST-ABL ; ! "before"
ol:ol V-AUX ; ! "can"
org:org N1-REMOVE ; 
orqasindan:orqasindan POST-GEN ; ! "after"
of:of IJ ; !
ochtir:ochtir V-TV-CAUS ; ! 0.9999584440281011
piliksiz:piliksiz A1 ; ! 0.9999999984364903
Professor:Professor TIT ; ! ""
prof:prof TIT ; ! ""
Sbc:Sbc ABBR ; !
sevish:sevish V-TV-COOP ; ! 0.9818763030757244
sogin:sogin VERB-TV ; ! "to miss"
sodir:sodir A2--V ; ! 0.9665851901208814
tezlash:tezlash V-IV-COOP ; ! 0.912116707228765
toʻsiqliq:toʻsiqliq N1 ; ! 0.9999999999750199
tomon:tomon POST-DAT ; ! "until"
topil:topilgan VERB-IV ; ! "to be found"
truppala:truppala V-TV ; ! 
tusla:tusla V-IV ; ! 0.8786939320953054
tuttir:tuttir V-TV-CAUS ; ! 0.9999999996138716
ushbu:ushbu PRON-DEM-BU ; ! "this"
faqat:faqat POSTADV ; ! "only"
xoinlarcha:xoinlarcha ADV ; ! 0.5374470514322229
holbuki:holbuki CS ; ! 0.6515393468769279
choʻzilish:choʻzilish V-IV-COOP ; ! 0.9636836958829818
chuqurlan:chuqurlan V-IV-REFL ; ! 0.9999810845654196
shu% sababli:shu% sababli CA ; ! "hence"
ekranlashtirish:ekranlashtirish N1-VN ; ! 0.9772508466525522
yu:yu QST ; ! "" 
yarasha:yarasha POST-NOM ; ! ""
LEXICON Proper
Varese:Varese NP-TOP ; ! ""
hamda:hamda CC ; ! "as well"
yani:yani IJ ; ! ""
Abuja:Abuja  NP-TOP ; ! "" ! El++
Gurzuf:Gurzuf  NP-TOP ; ! "" ! El++
Gaynutdinov:Gaynutdinov  NP-COG-MF ; ! "" ! El++
Maksimovich:Maksimovich  NP-COG-MF ; ! "" ! El++
Karpov:Karpov  NP-COG-MF ; ! "" ! El++
Boqar:Boqar   NP-ANT-M  ; ! From Uzbek names book.
Keldi:Keldi   NP-ANT-M  ; ! From Uzbek names book.
Shohyora:Shohyora   NP-ANT-M  ; ! From Uzbek names book.
Gulambar:Gulambar   NP-ANT-F  ; ! From Uzbek names book.
Maydongul:Maydongul   NP-ANT-F  ; ! From Uzbek names book.
Toʻlaniso:Toʻlaniso   NP-ANT-F  ; ! From Uzbek names book.
